Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,129
Disposition of assets.

Member approval by at least two-thirds of the patron members voting under section 21-2939 and by at least a two-thirds vote of the investor members, if voting, under section 21-2942, is required for a limited cooperative association to sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the assets of the limited cooperative association.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 129.